California statutes. Education Code
(3) The allocation of local property tax revenues has been accurately determined and will be appropriately implemented.

(4) The annexation will not significantly affect the racial or ethnic composition of the district affected.

(5) The annexation will not decrease education opportunities for residents of districts involved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1214, Sec. 5.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

74139.

Whenever a county committee approves a petition, within 10 days it shall transmit a copy of the approved petition, together with any related information or recommendations, to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges for review.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 386.)
-------------------------------------------

74140.

Whenever a county committee rejects a petition, it shall notify the chief petitioners and the board of governors of its action and provide in writing the basis for rejection.

The county committee need not accept a new petition on the same territory filed within 12 months of its decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 387.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Formation [74150. - 74159.]

74150.

Provisions of this article shall apply only to petitions for the formation of a new community college district consisting of either nondistrict territory, territory of one or more existing community college districts, or a combination of nondistrict territory and the territory of one or more existing community college districts subject to the provisions of Section 74000.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1214, Sec. 5.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

74151.

An action to form a new community college district is initiated upon the filing of a petition with the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction. A petition to form a new community college district shall be signed by one of the following:

(a) Where the territory to be formed into the new district is not a part of an existing district, at least 25 percent of the registered voters residing in that territory shall sign the petition. Where the petition is to form a new district by combining the territory of one or more existing community college districts, at least 25 percent of the registered voters residing in each affected existing district shall sign the petition.

(b) A majority of the members of the governing board of each of the community college districts and of each of the high school or unified school districts located within the territory to be formed into a new community college district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1214, Sec. 5.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

74152.

The provisions of Sections 74102 and 74103 shall apply to a petition to form a new district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1214, Sec. 5.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

74153.

Within 30 days after the petition to form a new district is filed, the county superintendent of schools shall examine the petition, and, if the board of governors finds it to be sufficient and signed as required by law, shall transmit the petition simultaneously to each of the following:

(a) The governing board of each component school district and community college district affected by the proposed formation.

(b) The county superintendent and county committee of each county which has jurisdiction over each component school district and community college district affected.

(c) The board of governors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

74154.

(a) The county committee may add to the petition any appropriate provisions which were not included in the petition as filed and may amend any provision which was so included.

(b) At least 10 days before the public hearing on the petition, the county committee shall make available to the public, to the governing boards of districts affected by the petition, and to the board of governors a description of the petition and a report which includes a description or analysis of the impact of the proposed change on the following:

(1) Funding of each affected unified or high school and community college district, including a determination of the level and sources of local property or special taxes to be levied for general purposes of the proposed new community college district.

In those instances where the new district is formed exclusively within nondistrict territory, the property tax contribution to the new district shall not be less than the proportion that the tax levied in the 1977–78 fiscal year in the territory affected pursuant to former Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 2100) of Part 2 bore to the total property tax levied in that territory in 1977–78.

Alternative sources of local tax contribution to the recipient district, as may be permitted by law, shall be included in the committee’s report.

(2) Property, obligations, and bonded indebtedness of the new district.

(3) Racial or ethnic composition of the recipient district.

(4) Governing board of the new district.

(5) County district master plan.

(6) Any matter considered significant by the county committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

74155.

Within 90 days after affording the public an opportunity to comment on the petition, the report, and the recommendations included in the report, a county committee shall forward a copy of the petition and the report to each affected governing board and the board of governors for review.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 392.)
-------------------------------------------

74156.

Each affected district governing board shall set a date for a hearing on the petition, which shall be within 60 days of the receipt of the petition forwarded pursuant to Section 74155, and the county superintendent shall notify the chief petitioners of the times and places of the hearings, where appropriate. At the hearings, interested persons shall be given an opportunity to present their views on the petition. The affected district governing boards then shall either approve or deny the petition. No new district shall be formed unless a majority of the members of a majority of the affected district governing boards sign a statement agreeing to all conditions of the formation at the hearings. Upon completion of the hearings, each affected school district governing board shall return the petition, together with a notice of action, to the county committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1181, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

74157.

The county committee may approve the petition only if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) A majority of the affected district governing boards have consented to all conditions of the formation by an agreement signed by a majority of the members of each board.

(b) The county committee finds that:

(1) The formation will not result in any increased cost to the state.

(2) The formation will not result in a reduction in state aid to community college districts not party to the petition.

(3) The projected funding of the new district is adequate to meet its needs as projected during the first five years of operation.

(4) The allocation of local property tax revenues has been accurately determined and will be appropriately implemented.

(5) The formation will not significantly affect the racial or ethnic composition of the districts affected.

(6) The formation will not decrease educational opportunities for residents of the districts affected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1181, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

74158.

Whenever a county committee approves a petition, within 10 days it shall transmit a copy of the approved petition, together with any related information or recommendations, to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges for review.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 395.)
-------------------------------------------

74159.

Whenever a county committee rejects a petition, it shall notify the chief petitioners and the board of governors of its action and provide in writing the basis for rejection.

The county committee need not accept a new petition on the same territory filed within 12 months of its decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 396.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Procedures for Districts Located Within Different Counties [74180. - 74180.]

74180.

Where an action to reorganize or form districts would affect territory which is located in more than one county, or which is under the jurisdiction of more than one county superintendent of schools, the proceedings to be conducted or the actions to be taken by county officers or agencies shall be conducted or taken according to the provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 35520) of Chapter 3 of Part 21.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1214, Sec. 5.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Review by State Agencies [74201. - 74205.]

74201.

(a) Any person who questions the findings of a county committee that a proposed transfer of territory will not adversely affect the racial or ethnic composition of the colleges of the districts affected by the proposal may file an appeal with the board of governors within 30 days after a decision based upon the finding has been made. The appeal shall be based upon factual and statistical evidence.

(b) If the board of governors denies an appeal filed pursuant to subdivision (a), the decision of the county committee shall stand.

(c) If the board of governors rejects the findings of the county committee, the county committee shall hold another hearing in order to reconsider its decision based upon the findings of the board of governors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1214, Sec. 5.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

74202.

Upon receipt of an approved petition, the board of governors may make whatever inquiries or studies are necessary to validate information and recommendations submitted by the county committee prior to making a recommendation to the board of governors. When it is necessary for the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges to evaluate a reorganization proposal, each county superintendent of schools and every other county officer in the counties affected and the superintendents of the districts affected and the county committee shall provide the information required to complete the review.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 399.)
-------------------------------------------

74203.

The board of governors may return the petition for reorganization to the county committee for its reconsideration of information found to be incorrect in the proposal. The county committee shall take whatever action it deems necessary to verify the original proposal or to resubmit a corrected proposal pursuant to procedures described in Sections 74105 and 74106.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1214, Sec. 5.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

74204.

At least 30 days prior to the date of the hearing, the board of governors shall announce the purpose of the proposal and the time and place of the hearing to each of the following:

(a) The governing board and district superintendent of each district whose boundaries would be affected.

(b) The county superintendent and county committee of each county which has jurisdiction over any of the districts whose boundaries would be affected.

(c) The persons designated in the petitions as “chief petitioners.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1214, Sec. 5.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

74205.

After affording interested persons an opportunity to present their views on the proposal, the board of governors shall give notice of approval or disapproval to the county committee and county superintendents of schools having jurisdiction over any of the districts whose boundaries would be affected by the reorganization.

Whenever a proposal is disapproved, the board of governors shall provide in writing the basis for rejection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1214, Sec. 5.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Elections and Board of Supervisors Procedures [74230. - 74251.]



  ARTICLE 1. Elections [74230. - 74230.]

74230.

If approval is given pursuant to Section 74205 to a reorganization proposal which results in an increase in taxes levied on behalf of the districts involved or which requires changes in district governing boards, such as a change that results in the reapportionment of trustee areas or a change in the number of trustee areas, the county superintendent of schools, within 30 days after receiving notification pursuant to Section 74205, shall call an election. The election shall be called in the manner prescribed in Part 4 (commencing with Section 5000), and shall be conducted at the next available regular election scheduled in the territory of districts defined in the approved proposal according to the procedures prescribed by Sections 35757 to 35764, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1095, Sec. 8.   Effective September 27, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Board of Supervisors Procedures [74250. - 74251.]

74250.

After the board of supervisors receives official notification that an action to reorganize districts has been approved as provided by law, the board of supervisors shall issue an order to change districts where required by the action, and to establish or reestablish the boundaries of the districts affected by the action. The order shall be entered in the county’s record of districts.

If the action results in a change of district boundaries of the type described in Section 54900 of the Government Code, the order of the board of supervisors shall include the legal description of each district changed in the action and, immediately after making the order, the board of supervisors shall cause a copy of the order and a map or plat indicating the boundaries established for each district affected by the order to be filed as required by Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 54900) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1214, Sec. 5.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

74251.

(a) An action to reorganize districts is complete when the board of supervisors makes the order pursuant to Section 74250.

(b) After the expiration of one year from the date of the order, the order shall be conclusive evidence that the district has been legally organized, or the boundaries legally changed, as the case may be, and no suit shall be maintained which questions the validity of the organization or change of boundaries.

(c) For purposes of district tax revenues and governance, the order shall be effective as of the beginning of the succeeding fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1214, Sec. 5.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Miscellaneous [74262. - 74296.]



  ARTICLE 1. Territory of Districts [74262. - 74265.5.]

74262.

On or after January 1, 1983, a district shall not be reorganized to include territory which is separated from other portions of the territory of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1214, Sec. 5.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

74263.

Whenever territory is transferred or added by means of reorganization to another district in which trustee areas have been established, the territory being transferred shall become a part of the trustee areas to which it is contiguous. In the event that the territory being transferred is contiguous to more than one trustee area, terms of agreement to the transfer may include provisions for the division of the transferred territory among the trustee areas to which it is contiguous.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1214, Sec. 5.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

74264.

Territory within the boundaries of a city may not be withdrawn from a district governed by a board provided for in the charter of the city without the consent of the governing board of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1214, Sec. 5.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

74265.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, an action to form a new community college district from a portion of an existing community college district shall be deemed to be approved as provided by law, for purposes of Section 74250, without election, when approval of that action is given by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges pursuant to Section 74205, provided that the proposed new district consists of an existing community college center and its service area, and all of the following conditions exist:

(A) The existing community college center in the proposed new district is located in a county other than the county in which the headquarters of the existing community college district is located.

(B) The community college center in the proposed new district is located 50 or more miles from any other campus or center in the existing community college district.

(C) The existing community college district has a total full-time equivalent enrollment in the 1997–98 fiscal year of not less than 6,500 students and not more than 7,000 students, and the existing community college center, which would become the community college campus in the proposed new district, has a full-time equivalent enrollment in the 1997–98 fiscal year of not less than 1,200 students and not more than 1,500 students.

(2) The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall take action as provided in this subdivision at the first regularly scheduled meeting or special meeting after the operative date of the act that adds Section 74265.5. A new community college district formed pursuant to this section shall be formed as soon as practicable on or after July 1 of the calendar year in which the act that adds Section 74265.5 becomes operative.

(b) The action to form a new community college district, as described in subdivision (a), shall be submitted for voter approval at an election that shall be called by the county superintendent of schools of the county in which the proposed new community college district is located upon the formation of a new community college district pursuant to subdivision (a). The election shall be called in the manner prescribed in Part 4 (commencing with Section 5000), and shall be conducted at the next available regular election scheduled in the territory of the new community college district defined in the approved proposal according to the procedures prescribed by Sections 35757 to 35764, inclusive. In the event that, pursuant to that election, the voters fail to approve that action, the new community college district formed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be thereupon annexed as a center by the community college district from which it was formed.

(c) The election of the first governing board of the community college district formed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be called and conducted together with the election provided for under subdivision (b).

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the requirements set forth in Article 3 (commencing with Section 74150) of Chapter 2 do not apply to the action to form a new community college district described in subdivision (a). It is the intent of the Legislature that the formation of a district pursuant to this section not adversely affect the state funding of community college districts in subsequent fiscal years.

(e) Upon the formation of a new community college district pursuant to this section, the county superintendent of schools for the county in which the new district is situated shall appoint an interim governing board for the new district pursuant to application and selection procedures established by the county superintendent. There shall be five at-large appointees, and these appointees shall constitute the governing board of the new community college district until the members of the governing board elected pursuant to subdivision (c) take office or, in the event that the voters fail to approve the action of forming the new community college district, until the new community college district is annexed, pursuant to subdivision (b), by the community college district from which it was formed.

(f) After the effective date of the formation of the new community college district pursuant to this section, one district may contract with the other district for the performance of services under terms and conditions that may be agreed upon by the two districts.

(g) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, after the effective date of the formation of a new community college district pursuant to this section, the new community college district shall receive all state funding to which a district of its enrollment with fully accredited programs of instruction would be entitled. Funds authorized, appropriated, or apportioned for distribution to the new community college district, regardless of source, and regardless of whether those funds are presently being handled by the county office of education in which the existing district is headquartered, shall be transferred to, directed to, and channeled through, the county office of education for the county in which the new district is located.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the property tax properly attributable to the territory of the new district shall also be transferred to the county office of education for the county in which the new district is located as of July 1 of the calendar year in which the transfer becomes effective.

(h) When procedures implemented pursuant to this section require notice to affected county agencies, and if the territory of the new and old districts is located in more than two counties, then these notices are required to be provided only to the two counties containing the largest parcels of territory comprising the old and new community college districts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 82, Sec. 2.   Effective July 12, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

74265.5.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the disposition of records, funds, property, and obligations when a community college district is formed as specified in Section 74265 shall be governed by Article 3 (commencing with Section 74280) and by any applicable regulations adopted by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges.

(b) The existing community college district and a new community college district established pursuant to Section 74265 shall enter into an agreement providing for matters relating to the formation of a new community college district. Those matters to be included in the agreement include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Assignment of existing academic employees and classified employees.

(2) Division and disposition of all interests in property, buildings, fixtures, and leases thereon, including, but not necessarily limited to, any agreement entered into pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 81300) of Part 49.

(3) Facilities and equipment, including, but not limited to, existing obligations for the acquisition, procurement, or maintenance of electronic systems, materials, goods, and services.

(4) Division and transfer of funds and obligations, other than bonded indebtedness, affected by the formation of the proposed new community college district.

(5) Transfer of all records required to be maintained by a community college district, including student records maintained in accordance with Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 76200) of Part 47.

(6) Division and transfer of all existing and potential rights, obligations, and liabilities, whether at law or in equity.

(c) The agreement to be entered into pursuant to this section shall expressly provide that the proposed new community college district shall successfully complete accreditation as required by law on or before a date to be specified in the agreement. Nothing in this subdivision shall require the existing community college district to sustain accreditation for the proposed new community college district after the date specified in the agreement for the proposed new community college district to complete accreditation.

(d) The agreement to be entered into pursuant to this section shall specify that funds derived from the sale of bonds issued by the existing community college district shall be used for the acquisition, construction, or improvement of college property only in the territory comprising the existing community college district after formation of the proposed new community college district or to discharge the bonded indebtedness of the existing community college district, except that, if the bonded indebtedness is assumed by the proposed new community college district, the funds may be used in any area of the new district for the purposes for which the bonds were originally voted.

(e) For purposes of this section, the interim board of governors appointed by the county superintendent of schools shall be deemed authorized at all times to execute the agreement provided for by this section on behalf of the proposed new community college district until the members of the first elected governing board of the new community college district take office in accordance with Section 74265.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 82, Sec. 3.   Effective July 12, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Personnel in Reorganized Districts [74270. - 74270.]

74270.

(a) The reorganization of any district or districts shall not affect the classification of academic employees already employed by any district affected. Those employees shall have the same status with respect to their classification by the district, including time served as probationary employees of the district, after the reorganization as they had prior to it. If the reorganization results in the college or other place in which any of these employees is employed being maintained by another district, the employee, if a permanent employee of the district that formerly maintained the college or other place of employment, shall be employed as a permanent employee of the district which thereafter maintains the college or other place of employment, unless the employee elects prior to February 1 of the year in which the action will become effective for all purposes to continue in the employ of the first district.

If the employee is a probationary employee of the district that formerly maintained the college or other place of employment, he or she shall be employed by the district which thereafter maintains the college or other place of employment, unless the probationary employee is terminated by the district pursuant to Section 87610.1 or 87740, and, if not so terminated, his or her status with respect to classification by that district shall be the same as it would have been had the college or other place of employment been continued to be maintained by the district which formerly maintained it. As used in this section, “the college or other place in which any of these employees is employed” and all references thereto, includes, but is not limited to, the services or program that, as a result of any reorganization of a district, will be provided by another district, regardless of whether any particular building or buildings in which that service or program was conducted is physically located in the new district and regardless of whether any new district resulting from the reorganization elects to provide for the education of its students by contracting with another district until the time as the district constructs its own facilities.

(b) The reorganization of any district, or districts, shall not affect the rights of persons employed in classified positions to retain the salary, leaves, and other benefits which they would have received if the reorganization had not occurred and in the manner provided in this section:

(1) All employees of every district that is included in any other district shall become employees of the new district.

(2) When a portion of the territory of any district becomes part of another district, employees regularly assigned to perform their duties in the territory affected shall become employees of the acquiring district. Employees whose assignments pertained to the affected territory, but whose employment situs was not in the territory, may elect to remain with the original district or become employees of the acquiring district.

(3) When the territory of any district is divided between, or among, two or more districts and the original district ceases to exist, employees of the original district regularly assigned to perform their duties in any specific territory of the district shall become employees of the district acquiring the territory. Employees not assigned to specific territory within the original district shall become employees of any acquiring district at the election of the employees.

(4) Employees regularly assigned by the original district to any college in the district shall be employees of the district in which the college is located. Except as provided in this section, nothing in this section shall deprive the governing board of the acquiring district from making reasonable reassignments of duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 87.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Disposition of Records, Funds, Property, and Obligations When Reorganized [74280. - 74284.]

74280.

The agreement of transfer required by Section 74107 shall provide for the allocation of funds, property, and obligations affected by the transfer, except for bonded indebtedness. The following procedure may be used to determine such allocation:

(a) The real property and personal property and fixtures normally situated thereat shall be the property of the district in which the real property is located.

(b) All other property, funds, and obligations, except bonded indebtedness, shall be divided pro rata among the districts in which the territory of the former district is included. The basis for the division and allocation shall be the assessed valuation of the part of the former district which is included within each of the districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1214, Sec. 5.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

74281.

If a dispute arises between the governing boards of the districts concerning the division of funds, property, or obligations, a board of arbitrators shall be appointed which shall resolve the dispute. The board shall consist of one person selected by the district from which the territory is withdrawn, one person selected by the district of which it has become a part, and a third person appointed by the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction. If more than one county superintendent of schools has jurisdiction over the affected districts, county superintendents involved shall jointly appoint an arbitrator. The districts involved may mutually agree that the person appointed as arbitrator by the county superintendent of schools may act as sole arbitrator of the matters to be submitted to arbitration. The necessary expenses and compensation of the arbitrators shall be divided equally between the districts, and the payment of the portion of the expenses is a legal charge against the funds of the school districts. The arbitrator or arbitrators shall make a written finding on the matter submitted to arbitration. The written finding and determination of a majority of the board of arbitrators is final and binding upon the districts submitting the question to the board of arbitration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1214, Sec. 5.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

74284.

Notwithstanding any provisions of this article, exchanges of property tax revenues between districts as a result of reorganization shall be determined pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 99 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1214, Sec. 5.   Effective September 22, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Bonded Indebtedness of Districts When Reorganized [74290. - 74290.]

74290.

(a) This article shall apply only to the reallocation of bonded indebtedness incurred prior to July 1, 1978.

(b) When a district is reorganized, the liability for taxation for the outstanding bonded indebtedness of the district or the territory affected thereby is as provided in this article. The authorities whose duty it is to levy taxes for the payment of principal and interest on the outstanding bonds shall levy the taxes upon the districts affected in such proportions as are provided in, or are determined under, the authority of this article.

(c) No territory shall be taken from any district having any outstanding bonded indebtedness and made a part of another district where the action, if taken, would so reduce the last equalized assessed valuation of a district from which the territory was taken that the outstanding bonded indebtedness of the district would exceed 5 percent of the assessed valuation remaining in the district for the level maintained, on the date the reorganization is effective.

(d) When any district is in any manner merged with one or more districts so as to form a single district by any procedure, the district so formed is liable for all of the outstanding bonded indebtedness of the districts united or merged. 

(e) When territory is taken from one district and transferred to another district and the area transferred contains no college property or buildings, the territory shall drop any liability for outstanding bonded indebtedness in the district of which it was formerly a part and shall automatically assume its proportionate share of the outstanding bonded indebtedness of the district of which it becomes a part.

(f) When territory is taken from one district and transferred to another district by any procedure and the area transferred contains college buildings or property, the district to which the territory is annexed shall take possession of the building and the equipment on the day when the annexation becomes effective for all purposes. The territory transferred shall cease to be liable for the bonded indebtedness of the district of which it was formerly a part and shall automatically assume its proportionate share of the outstanding bonded indebtedness of any district of which it becomes a part.

(g) The acquiring district shall pay the original district the greatest of the amounts determined under paragraph (1) or (2).

(1) The proportionate share of the outstanding bonded indebtedness of the original district, which proportionate share shall be in the ratio which the total assessed valuation of the transferring territory bears to the total assessed valuation of the original district in the year immediately preceding the date on which the annexation is effective for all purposes. This ratio shall be used each year until the bonded indebtedness for which the acquiring district is liable has been repaid.

(2) That portion of the outstanding bonded indebtedness of the original district which was incurred for the acquisition or improvement of school lots or buildings, or fixtures located therein, and situated in the territory transferred.

(h) The county board of supervisors shall compute for the reorganized districts an annual tax rate for bond interest and redemption which will include the bond interest and redemption on the outstanding bonded indebtedness specified in paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (g). The tax rate shall be levied in excess of any other ad valorem property tax authorized or required by law and shall not be included in the computation of the limitation specified in subdivision (a) or Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 409.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Continuing Services If Compton Community College Loses Accreditation [74292. - 74296.]

74292.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the following steps shall be taken to address the imminent risk that Compton Community College’s accreditation will be terminated by the regional accrediting body recognized by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges:

(a) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges is authorized to oversee all actions at the Compton Community College District related to the loss of the college’s accreditation and efforts described in this article to address that situation. The Compton Community College District shall reimburse the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges for any expenses incurred by the chancellor or his or her staff in carrying out this oversight responsibility.

(b) The Compton Community College District shall complete the provision of instruction for all classes for which it intends to claim apportionment prior to the date of its loss of accreditation.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Compton Community College District shall continue to be eligible to receive state funding as provided in this article even if its accreditation is terminated.

(d) (1) The Compton Community College District shall identify a partner district that will agree to provide accredited instructional programs to students residing in the Compton Community College District. The special trustee assigned to the Compton Community College District pursuant to Section 71093 and the partner district are authorized to enter into one or more agreements to provide instructional services or other services, and to make any other necessary preparations to implement the educational programs described in this article, as well as any related necessary administrative or support services, in a timely manner so as to ensure that services to Compton Community College students will not be interrupted and that those students will remain eligible for federal financial assistance. The agreement or agreements shall provide that the partner district is entitled to receive a reasonable administrative fee to be fixed by the mutual agreement of the parties.

(2) The partner district shall be a district in good standing with the Accrediting Commission for Community and Junior Colleges (ACCJC), and shall have successfully completed the accreditation cycle and secured accreditation for its colleges. A district with a college that is on warning, probation, or show-cause status with the ACCJC, or that is being monitored for fiscal stability by the chancellor’s office is not considered a district in good standing for the purposes of this article.
